public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec2.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX A erenar areno/JL derenar
SFX A erenar arenon/L derenar
SFX A erenar arenone derenar
SFX A erenar arenoni/M derenar
SFX A erenar arenonse derenar
SFX A erenar arenà derenar
SFX A erenar arenàa/JLPR derenar
SFX A erenar arenàami/K derenar
SFX A erenar arenàau/Q derenar
SFX A erenar arenàe/JL derenar
SFX A erenar arenàelo/S derenar
SFX A erenar arenàemi/K derenar
SFX A erenar arenài/NP derenar
SFX A erenar arenàimo/L derenar
SFX A erenar arenàimoi/M derenar
SFX A erenar arenàitu/O derenar
SFX A erenar arenàndome/G derenar
SFX A erenar arenàndomene/G derenar
SFX A erenar arenào/JL derenar
SFX A erenar arenàomi/K derenar
SFX A erenar arenàrmene/G derenar
SFX A erenar arenàsimo derenar
SFX A erenar arenàvami/K derenar
SFX A erenar arenàvau/Q derenar
SFX A erenar arenàvelo/S derenar
SFX A erenar arenàvemi/K derenar
SFX A erenar arenàvimo/L derenar
SFX A erenar arenàvimoi/M derenar
SFX A erenar arenàvitu/O derenar
SFX A erenar arenàvomi/K derenar
SFX A erenar arenè/FP derenar
SFX A erenar arenème/H derenar
SFX A erenar arenèu/Q derenar
SFX A erenar arené/FP derenar
SFX A erenar arenéa/JLPR derenar
SFX A erenar arenéami/K derenar
SFX A erenar arenéau/Q derenar
SFX A erenar arenée/JL derenar
SFX A erenar arenéelo/S derenar
SFX A erenar arenéemi/K derenar
SFX A erenar arenéi/NP derenar
SFX A erenar arenéimo/L derenar
SFX A erenar arenéimoi/M derenar
SFX A erenar arenéitu/O derenar
SFX A erenar arenémoi/M derenar
SFX A erenar arenéndome/G derenar
SFX A erenar arenéndomene/G derenar
SFX A erenar arenéo/JL derenar
SFX A erenar arenéomi/K derenar
SFX A erenar arenésimo derenar
SFX A erenar arenéu/Q derenar
SFX A erenar arenévami/K derenar
SFX A erenar arenévau/Q derenar
SFX A erenar arenévelo/S derenar
SFX A erenar arenévemi/K derenar
SFX A erenar arenévimo/L derenar
SFX A erenar arenévimoi/M derenar
SFX A erenar arenévitu/O derenar
SFX A erenar arenévomi/K derenar
SFX A erenar arénelo/S derenar
SFX A erenar aréneme/H derenar
SFX A erenar arénemi/K derenar
SFX A erenar arénitu/O derenar
SFX A erenar arénomi/K derenar
SFX A erensiar arensen/L desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensene desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arenseni/M desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensense desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensi/N desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensia/FR desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiada desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiade desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiadi desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiado desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiando/E desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiante desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiar/E desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiaralo/S desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiarami/K desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiaratu/O desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiarave/RT desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiare desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiaremo/L desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiaren/L desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiareni/M desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiarense desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiaresi/P desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiaresiu/Q desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiarion/L desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiarioni/M desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiarionse desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiarisen/L desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiariseni/M desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiarisense desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiarision/L desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiarisioni/M desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiarisionse desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiarisié/P desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiarisiéu/Q desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiarison/L desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiarisoni/M desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiarisonse desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiarié/P desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiariéu/Q desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiarme/G desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiaron/L desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiaroni/M desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiaronse desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiarà/JLNR desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiaràe/R desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiarè/JL desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiarèmi/K desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiaré/P desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiarémoi/M desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiarésimo/L desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiarésimoi/M desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiaréu/Q desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiaría/JLNR desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiaríami/K desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiaríatu/O desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiaríe/JLR desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiaríelo/S desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiaríemi/K desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiarò/JL desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiaròmi/K desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiase/I desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiasi desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiasta/I desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiaste/I desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiasti/I desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiasto/I desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiava/JLPR desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiave/JL desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiavi/NP desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiavo/JL desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensie/JLR desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiede desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiege desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiemo/L desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensien/L desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiendo/E desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiene desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensieni/M desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensieralo/S desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensierami/K desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensieratu/O desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensierave/RT desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensieremo/L desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensieren/L desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiereni/M desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensierense desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensieresi/P desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensieresiu/Q desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensierion/L desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensierioni/M desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensierionse desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensierisen/L desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensieriseni/M desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensierisense desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensierision/L desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensierisioni/M desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensierisionse desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensierisié/P desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensierisiéu/Q desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensierison/L desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensierisoni/M desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensierisonse desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensierié/P desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensieriéu/Q desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensieron/L desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensieroni/M desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensieronse desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensierà/JLNR desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensieràe/R desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensierè/JL desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensierèmi/K desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensieré/P desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensierémoi/M desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensierésimo/L desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensierésimoi/M desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensieréu/Q desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiería/JLNR desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensieríami/K desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensieríatu/O desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensieríe/JLR desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensieríelo/S desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensieríemi/K desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensierò/JL desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensieròmi/K desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiese/I desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiesi desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiesta/I desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensieste/I desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiesti/I desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiesto/I desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensieva/JLPR desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensieve/JL desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensievi/NP desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensievo/JL desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensio/JL desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arension/L desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensione desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensioni/M desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensionse desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensisen/L desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensisene desferensiar
SFX A erensiar arensiseni/M desferensiar
