public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec2.dic
aƚar/A
alegrar/A
alŧetar/A
traxandar/A
arar/A
ardenar/A
aromatidar/A
asúmer/A
inasidar/A
reaver/A
badajar/A
xbailar/A
inbakukir/A
xbaƚansar/A
dexbalonar/A
rebaltar/A
dexbandir/A
xbanpoƚar/A
xbaraŧar/A
xbarkar/A
bastar/A
batidar/A
xbasegar/A
xbaveŧar/A
xbefexar/A
xberegar/A
xbeŧolar/A
biankir/A
biaxemar/A
skonbinar/A
inbironar/A
bixegoƚar/A
sobóɉer/A
trabokar/A
inboloñar/A
bonasar/A
xborar/A
xborfar/A
boteđar/A
dexbosar/A
brakidar/A
xbrajar/A
brasar/A
xbrefeƚar/A
xbrindoƚar/A
dexbrokar/A
brontolar/A
brustoƚar/A
inbulir/A
butar/A
dexbuxoƚar/A
scaredar/A
incénder/A
aparcéñer/A
cicolar/A
scoketar/A
dixdir/A
danexar/A
dentelar/A
devorsiar/A
indivinar/A
doɉiđar/A
dolŧir/A
pardonar/A
indormenŧar/A
dresar/A
dúxer/A
đaliđar/A
xavariar/A
xogatar/A
ađónxer/A
soradónxer/A
đugolar/A
skondurar/A
efetuar/A
emuƚar/A
ineskar/A
exaurir/A
konfar/A
afadegar/A
faliar/A
fameɉaridar/A
faoredar/A
faŧar/A
favorexar/A
palifegar/A
femenar/A
inferar/A
festiđar/A
infiakir/A
infibiar/A
desfikar/A
sfilaŧar/A
fiolar/A
prefisar/A
desfiubar/A
infogar/A
foleđar/A
forbir/A
formalidar/A
forsar/A
fradeliđar/A
frànxer/A
fraskeđar/A
sfraseƚar/A
refreskar/A
fritoƚar/A
fruƚar/A
refujar/A
infuriar/A
ingabanar/A
galexar/A
galopar/A
xgangerar/A
dexgarbelar/A
xgargarixar/A
ingavasar/A
xgiñasar/A
paragonar/A
xgorgexar/A
gramolar/A
xgraneƚar/A
graŧiar/A
gređar/A
xgrendenar/A
ingringolir/A
ingritoƚir/A
grongolar/A
gruñir/A
malguaƚivar/A
xguilsar/A
proibir/A
indulxentar/A
inkiostrar/A
insir/A
intriveƚar/A
iŧar/A
injarar/A
xɉedolar/A
inɉemarar/A
ɉostrar/A
ɉoŧolar/A
jugular/A
deskàđer/A
skagasar/A
kaƚefar/A
kalkixoƚar/A
inkalŧar/A
kaminar/A
skanelar/A
inkankrenir/A
skantinar/A
deskapelar/A
inkapriŧiar/A
inkaratelar/A
skarnir/A
kartar/A
deskartoŧar/A
kastrar/A
deskatiɉar/A
inkasar/A
eskavar/A
inkaveŧar/A
proklamar/A
akòjer/A
kokonar/A
kolgar/A
komandar/A
komunegar/A
inkonkar/A
konóser/A
kontidar/A
skonsar/A
inkórer/A
rekordar/A
inkordeƚar/A
eskorporar/A
kostar/A
skoŧonar/A
kòxer/A
krestaliđar/A
kroar/A
krostoƚar/A
krupolixar/A
skuartar/A
skuèrder/A
deskular/A
kuniar/A
kustionar/A
lagar/A
ƚanguidir/A
xlapar/A
relasar/A
xlasar/A
ƚedamar/A
legaliđar/A
lesar/A
eƚevar/A
liberar/A
ligar/A
ƚimitar/A
xlisegar/A
traxlokar/A
lontanar/A
xlovar/A
stralunar/A
straƚúxer/A
xmagonar/A
xmaliŧiar/A
remandar/A
manidar/A
mañetixar/A
margotar/A
martoridar/A
xmaserar/A
matidar/A
xmaŧar/A
remediar/A
stramexar/A
demenar/A
xmenuŧar/A
merkantiđar/A
ométer/A
migrar/A
xminuŧar/A
remodernar/A
mokoƚar/A
moltiplegar/A
xmónxer/A
demoraliđar/A
remorkiar/A
mostrar/A
muar/A
mujar/A
mustagar/A
muxolar/A
xnaturar/A
negrir/A
dexniar/A
noɉar/A
denonsiar/A
anular/A
xñarar/A
ocexar/A
okeƚar/A
inonbrar/A
ónder/A
orbegar/A
orinar/A
ospitar/A
pacolar/A
pagar/A
inpaketar/A
spaƚetar/A
spaludar/A
apanar/A
spanpaƚar/A
papoƚar/A
reaparir/A
sparlar/A
partikolarixar/A
inpaxetar/A
pastixar/A
patriar/A
inspaŧientar/A
pedaƚar/A
inpegoƚar/A
spelatar/A
penar/A
respénđer/A
despenoƚar/A
repeonar/A
sperlongar/A
pestoƚar/A
petegoƚar/A
petufar/A
renpiànder/A
inpikolir/A
despirar/A
pisoƚar/A
despolpar/A
opóner/A
spontiñar/A
trasportar/A
spovoƚar/A
prexensiar/A
spuƚegar/A
inputridir/A
raɉonar/A
raskiar/A
rekuixir/A
reŧitar/A
iriŧolar/A
irokir/A
inrosar/A
rueƚar/A
saetar/A
saledar/A
sanjutar/A
scantixar/A
sekondar/A
inseɉar/A
sentir/A
sèrver/A
siɉilar/A
insíster/A
skaraventar/A
skermar/A
skravasar/A
sodar/A
solfixar/A
sorsar/A
sparpañar/A
sospetar/A
resplénder/A
stabilir/A
stansiar/A
stiletar/A
destokoƚar/A
astrénxer/A
strukolar/A
sublimar/A
sutiƚir/A
stakar/A
tardigar/A
taveƚar/A
intendacar/A
teñir/A
kontéñer/A
protestar/A
intokar/A
sintonixar/A
tòrđer/A
kontràer/A
tranxar/A
tràxer/A
destrigolar/A
trusar/A
insankar/A
interséder/A
konŧeñar/A
deservelar/A
siganar/A
manŧipar/A
desoƚar/A
dexumanar/A
vagedar/A
xvanŧar/A
sorveɉar/A
redeventar/A
arvèñer/A
vergar/A
inversiar/A
viadar/A
inviscar/A
invojar/A
involtar/A
inxaltrar/A
inxeloxir/A
xlapañar/A
xufoƚar/A
modifegar/A
dexnoar/A
pernotar/A
kipar/A
intardivar/A
repelir/A
sfoɉoƚar/A
storđar/A
kalafar/A
deƚofitar/A
